Washington statutes.
RCW 11.10.900

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies in all instances in which no other abatement scheme is expressly provided.

[ 1994 c 221 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1994 c 221: See note following RCW 11.100.035.